Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.015

Public employment—Evidence of educational competence.

A Washington high school equivalency certificate as awarded by the Washington state superintendent of public instruction or a high school equivalency certificate as provided in RCW 28B.50.536 shall be accepted in lieu of a high school diploma by the state and any local political subdivision when considering applicants for employment or promotion.

[ 2013 c 39 s 19; 1971 c 43 s 1.]